District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-922

Effective date.

Repealed.

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-92, § 704(b), 27 DCR 3390
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282,§ 11(s), 50 DCR 896
Deed recordation tax, exemptions, see § 42-1102.
1981 Ed., § 47-922.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 12(u) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 12(u) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(u) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(u) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(u) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).